Hawaii statutes.
§325-54 Reports confidential; penalty.
Any information secured from the tests or the reports in this part required to
be made by persons having access to such tests or reports shall be used only in
connection with their professional duties or within the scope and course of
their employment, but not otherwise, and except to the extent required in
connection with enforcement of the laws and ordinances of the State, and its
political subdivisions, and valid rules and regulations adopted thereunder,
which are for the protection of the public health, shall not be divulged to
others than the doctor and other person permitted by law to attend and
attending a pregnant woman, laboratory technicians, or the department of health
and its duly authorized representatives. Any person violating this section
shall be fined $500, or imprisoned not more than ninety days, or both. [L 1943,
c 219, §4; RL 1945, §2313; RL 1955, §49-53; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§325-54]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next